Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-9,105
Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 68-9,105 to 68-9,110:

(1) At-risk mother means a woman who is (a) eligible for medicaid, (b) pregnant, and (c) determined by her health care provider to be at risk of having a negative maternal or infant health outcome; and

(2) Targeted case management has the same meaning as defined in 42 C.F.R. 440.169, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2024, and may only be delivered in a clinical setting by a health care provider licensed pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 2024, LB857, § 2.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.